Utah statutes.
4-15-9.   Nursery stock offered or advertised for sale -- Unlawful to misrepresent name, origin, grade, variety, quality or vitality -- Information required in advertisements.

No person shall misrepresent the name, origin, grade, variety, quality, or indice of vitality of any nursery stock advertised or offered for sale at a nursery or nursery outlet. All advertisements of nursery stock shall clearly state the name, size, and grade of the stock where applicable.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

